Indiana, session 2026, SB202.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-3-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 15. (a) Each taxable
year, an individual who:
(1) is:
(A) a citizen or national of the United States; or
(B) an alien who has lawful permanent resident status or
conditional permanent resident status; and
(2) paid any fees under IC 28-8-4.1-707 for a money
transmission transaction during the taxable year;
is entitled to an international money wiring fee credit against the
individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for the taxable year.
(b) The amount of the credit is equal to the total amount of
international money wiring fees the individual paid during the
taxable year.
(c) To receive the credit provided by this section, an individual
must claim the credit on the individual's state tax return or returns
2026 IN 202—LS 6868/DI 120


in the manner prescribed by the department. The individual shall
submit to the department all information that the department
determines is necessary for the calculation of the credit provided
by this section.
(d) The credit provided by this section may not exceed the
amount of the individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for
the taxable year, reduced by the sum of all credits for the taxable
year that are applied before the application of the credit provided
by this section. The amount of any unused credit under this section
for a taxable year may not be carried forward to a succeeding
taxable year, carried back to a preceding taxable year, or
refunded.
SECTION 2. IC 6-8.1-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2023,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. "Listed taxes" or "taxes" includes only the
pari-mutuel taxes (IC 4-31-9-3 through IC 4-31-9-5); the supplemental
wagering tax (IC 4-33-12); the riverboat wagering tax (IC 4-33-13); the
slot machine wagering tax (IC 4-35-8); the type II gambling game
excise tax (IC 4-36-9); the gross income tax (IC 6-2.1) (repealed); the
utility receipts and utility services use taxes (IC 6-2.3) (repealed); the
state gross retail and use taxes (IC 6-2.5); the adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3); the pass through entity tax (IC 6-3-2.1); the supplemental net
income tax (IC 6-3-8) (repealed); the county adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3.5-1.1) (repealed); the county option income tax (IC 6-3.5-6)
(repealed); the county economic development income tax (IC 6-3.5-7)
(repealed); the local income tax (IC 6-3.6); the auto rental excise tax
(IC 6-6-9); the financial institutions tax (IC 6-5.5); the gasoline tax (IC
6-6-1.1); the special fuel tax (IC 6-6-2.5); the motor carrier fuel tax (IC
6-6-4.1); a motor fuel tax collected under a reciprocal agreement under
IC 6-8.1-3; the vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5); the aviation fuel excise
tax (IC 6-6-13); the commercial vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5.5); the
excise tax imposed on recreational vehicles and truck campers (IC
6-6-5.1); the hazardous waste disposal tax (IC 6-6-6.6) (repealed); the
heavy equipment rental excise tax (IC 6-6-15); the vehicle sharing
excise tax (IC 6-6-16); the cigarette tax (IC 6-7-1); the closed system
cartridge tax (IC 6-7-2-7.5); the electronic cigarette tax (IC 6-7-4); the
beer excise tax (IC 7.1-4-2); the liquor excise tax (IC 7.1-4-3); the wine
excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4); the hard cider excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4.5); the
petroleum severance tax (IC 6-8-1); the various innkeeper's taxes (IC
6-9); the various food and beverage taxes (IC 6-9); the county
admissions tax (IC 6-9-13 and IC 6-9-28); the oil inspection fee (IC
16-44-2); the penalties assessed for oversize vehicles (IC 9-20-3 and
2026 IN 202—LS 6868/DI 120


IC 9-20-18); the fees and penalties assessed for overweight vehicles (IC
9-20-4 and IC 9-20-18); the international money wiring fee (IC
28-8-4.1-707); and any other tax or fee that the department is required
to collect or administer.
SECTION 3. IC 28-8-4.1-707 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 707. (a) A licensee shall collect an
international money wiring fee from the sender of a money
transmission transaction if the recipient of the money is located
outside of the United States. The amount of the fee is:
(1) in the case of a transaction in which the transmission is in
an amount of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), five
dollars ($5); and
(2) in the case of a transaction in which the transmission is in
an amount greater than five hundred dollars ($500), the sum
of:
(A) five dollars ($5); plus
(B) an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the amount of
the transmission that exceeds five hundred dollars ($500).
(b) A licensee shall remit quarterly the fee collections under
subsection (a) to the department of state revenue. The licensee shall
remit the fees collected during a particular quarter before the
fifteenth day of the month immediately following the last month of
the quarter. At the time the fees are remitted, the licensee shall file
a return on a form prescribed by the department of state revenue.
(c) Fees remitted under this section shall be deposited in the
state general fund.
(d) The department of state revenue shall prescribe a notice
with a statement including information that an individual who:
(1) is:
(A) a citizen or national of the United States; or
(B) an alien who has lawful permanent resident status or
conditional permanent resident status;
(2) has a valid Social Security number; and
(3) files an Indiana individual adjusted gross income tax
return;
may be eligible for the international money wiring fee tax credit
provided under IC 6-3-3-15. Each licensee and each of the
licensee's delegates shall post the notice prescribed by the
department of state revenue.
(e) The international money wiring fee shall be considered a
listed tax for purposes of IC 6-8.1.
2026 IN 202—LS 6868/DI 120


(f) The director of the department, in conjunction with the
department of state revenue, may suspend the license of a licensee
if the licensee fails to report or fails to remit the fee under this
section. If the license of a licensee is suspended under this
subsection, the licensee may not reapply for a license until all
required reports have been filed and all required fee amounts have
been paid as set forth in this section.
(g) Upon request of the department of state revenue, the
director of the department may make a claim against the surety
bond of the licensee for noncompliance with this section.
(h) The drug enforcement section of the state police department
and the office of the attorney general may assist the department of
state revenue in conducting audits and prosecuting violations of
this section.
SECTION 4. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) IC 6-3-3-15, as added by this act, applies to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) This SECTION expires June 30, 2030.
SECTION 5. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 202—LS 6868/DI 120